District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-3802

Establishment.

Repealed.

History

June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-118, § 3, 39 DCR 3189
Feb. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-70, § 8(a), 40 DCR 7575
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1101, 44 DCR 7378

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2222.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 6(a) of Metropolitan Police Housing Assistance Program and Community Safety Temporary Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-63, October 8, 1993, law notification 40 DCR ]).

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 12-59, title XI, § 1101 ( 44 DCR 7356), eff. March 20, 1998, provided for the temporary repeal of §§ 45-2221 to 45-2226 [1981 Ed.]. Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided for expiration “after 225 days of its having taken effect.”